Utah statutes.
76-10-903.   Unfair discrimination in competitive practices.

Every person engaged in the production, manufacture, or distribution of any commodity in general use who intentionally for the purpose of destroying the competition of any regular, established dealer in such commodity, or to prevent the competition of any person who in good faith intends and attempts to become a dealer, discriminates between different sections, communities, or cities of this state by selling the commodity at a lower rate in one section, community, or city, or any portion thereof, than the person charges for the commodity in another section, community, or city, after equalizing the distance from the point of production, manufacture, or distribution and freight rates therefrom, is guilty of unfair discrimination.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

